Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 25-43-1.101.
Title; statement of purpose.

This chapter may be cited as the “Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law.”

This chapter is intended to provide a minimum procedural code for the operation of all state agencies when they take action affecting the rights and duties of the public. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as invalidating any rule or regulation adopted before July 1, 2005, if such rule or regulation was properly adopted in accordance with the law as it existed at the time of adoption. Nothing in this chapter is meant to discourage agencies from adopting procedures providing greater protections to the public or conferring additional rights upon the public; and save for express provisions of this chapter to the contrary, nothing in this chapter is meant to abrogate in whole or in part any statute prescribing procedural duties for an agency which are greater than or in addition to those provided here. This chapter is meant to apply to all rule-making that is not specifically excluded from this chapter or some portion thereof by its express terms or by the express terms of another chapter.

The purposes of the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law are: to provide legislative oversight of powers and duties delegated to administrative agencies; to increase public accountability of administrative agencies; to simplify government by assuring a uniform minimum procedure to which all agencies will be held in the conduct of their most important functions; to increase public access to governmental information; and to increase public participation in the formulation of administrative rules. In accomplishing its objectives, the intention of this chapter is to strike a fair balance between these purposes and the need for efficient, economical and effective government administration. This chapter is not meant to alter the substantive rights of any person or agency. Its impact is limited to procedural rights with the expectation that better substantive results will be achieved in the everyday conduct of state government by improving the process by which those results are attained.

From and after July 1, 2005, any reference to the Mississippi Administrative Procedure Act, the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Act, the Mississippi Administrative Procedure Law, or the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, being Section 25-43-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be deemed to mean and refer to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-1.102.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency” means a board, commission, department, officer or other administrative unit of this state, including the agency head, and one or more members of the agency head or agency employees directly or indirectly purporting to act on behalf or under the authority of the agency head. The term does not include the Legislature or any of its component units, the judiciary or any of its component units or the Governor. The term does not include a political subdivision of the state or any of the administrative units of a political subdivision. To the extent it purports to exercise authority subject to any provision of this chapter, an administrative unit otherwise qualifying as an “agency” must be treated as a separate agency even if the unit is located within or subordinate to another agency.

“Agency head” or “head of the agency” means an individual or body of individuals in whom the ultimate legal authority of the agency is vested by any provision of law.

“Agency proceeding” or “proceeding” means the process by which an agency considers:

A declaratory opinion pursuant to Section 25-43-2.103, or

A rule pursuant to Article III of this chapter.

“Agency record” means the official rule-making record of an agency pursuant to Section 25-43-3.112.

“Declaratory opinion” means an agency opinion rendered in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-43-2.103.

“Order” means an agency action of particular applicability that determines the legal rights, duties, privileges, immunities or other legal interests of one or more specific persons. An order shall be in writing signed by a person with authority to render the order, or if more than one (1) person has such authority by at least that number of such persons as jointly have the authority to render the order, or by a person authorized to render the order on behalf of all such persons. The term does not include an executive order issued by the Governor pursuant to Section 25-43-1.104, an opinion issued by the Attorney General pursuant to Section 7-5-25, an opinion issued by the Ethics Commission pursuant to Section 25-4-17, or a declaratory opinion rendered in accordance with Section 25-43-2.103.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, governmental subdivision or unit thereof, or public or private organization or entity of any character, and includes another agency.

“Provision of law” or “law” means the whole or a part of the federal or state Constitution, or of any federal or state (i) statute, (ii) case law or common law, (iii) rule of court, (iv) executive order, or (v) rule or order of an administrative agency.

“Rule” means the whole or a part of an agency regulation or other statement of general applicability that implements, interprets or prescribes:

Law or policy, or

The organization, procedure or practice requirements of an agency. The term includes the amendment, repeal or suspension of an existing rule. “Rule” does not include:

1. A regulation or statement concerning only the internal management of an agency which does not directly and substantially affect the procedural or substantive rights or duties of any segment of the public;

2. A regulation or statement that establishes criteria or guidelines to be used by the staff of an agency in performing audits, investigations or inspections, settling commercial disputes, negotiating commercial arrangements or in the defense, prosecution or settlement of cases, if disclosure of the criteria or guidelines would:

a. Enable law violators to avoid detection;

b. Facilitate disregard of requirements imposed by law; or

c. Give a clearly improper advantage to persons who are in an adverse position to the state;

3. A regulation or statement that only establishes specific prices to be charged for particular goods or services sold by an agency;

4. A regulation or statement concerning only the physical servicing, maintenance or care of agency owned or operated facilities or property;

5. A regulation or statement relating only to the use of a particular facility or property owned, operated or maintained by the state or any of its subdivisions, if the substance of the regulation or statement is adequately indicated by means of signs or signals to persons who use the facility or property;

6. A regulation or statement directly related only to inmates of a correctional or detention facility, students enrolled in an educational institution or patients admitted to a hospital, if adopted by that facility, institution or hospital;

7. A form whose contents or substantive requirements are prescribed by rule or statute, and instructions for the execution or use of the form;

8. An agency budget;

9. A compact or agreement between an agency of this state and one or more agencies of another state or states; or

10. An opinion of the Attorney General pursuant to Section 7-5-25, an opinion of the Ethics Commission pursuant to Section 25-4-17, or an Executive Order of the Governor.

“Rule-making” means the process for formulation and adoption of a rule.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 499, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-1.103.
Applicability and relation to other law.

This chapter applies to all agencies and all proceedings not expressly exempted under this chapter.

This chapter creates only procedural rights and imposes only procedural duties. They are in addition to those created and imposed by other statutes.

Specific statutory provisions which govern agency proceedings and which are in conflict with any of the provisions of this chapter shall continue to be applied to all proceedings of any such agency to the extent of such conflict only.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to amend, repeal or supersede the provisions of any other law; and, to the extent that the provisions of any other law conflict or are inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of such other law shall govern and control.

An agency may grant procedural rights to persons in addition to those conferred by this chapter so long as rights conferred upon other persons by any provision of law are not substantially prejudiced.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-1.104.
Suspension of chapter’s provisions when necessary to avoid loss of federal funds or services.

To the extent necessary to avoid a denial of funds or services from the United States which would otherwise be available to the state, the Governor, by executive order, may suspend, in whole or in part, one or more provisions of this chapter. The Governor, by executive order, shall declare the termination of a suspension as soon as it is no longer necessary to prevent the loss of funds or services from the United States.

If any provision of this chapter is suspended pursuant to this section, the Governor shall promptly report the suspension to the Legislature. The report may include recommendations concerning desirable legislation that may be necessary to conform this chapter to federal law, including the exemption, if appropriate, of a particular program from the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-1.105.
Waiver of rights.

Except to the extent precluded by another provision of law, a person may waive any right conferred upon that person by this chapter, or by any rule made pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-1.106.
Filings with agency; service; computation of time.

Whenever, under this chapter, a party or any person is permitted or required to file with an agency any pleading, motion or other document, filing must be made by delivery of the document to the agency, by mailing it to the agency or by transmitting it to the agency by electronic means, including, but not limited to, facsimile transfer or e-mail. Filing by electronic means is complete when the electronic equipment being used by the agency acknowledges receipt of the material. If the equipment used by the agency does not automatically acknowledge transmission, service is not complete until the filing party obtains an acknowledgment from the agency. Filing by mail is complete upon receipt by the agency.

The agency may implement this section by agency rule.

Whenever service is required by this chapter, and whether the service is made by a party, an agency or a presiding officer, service of orders, notices, pleadings, motions and other documents upon a party shall be made by delivering a copy to the party, by transmitting it to the party by electronic means, including, but not limited to, facsimile transfer or e-mail, or by mailing it to the party at the party’s last known address. Delivery of a copy means handing it to a party, leaving it at the office of a party with a person in charge thereof, or leaving it at the dwelling house or usual place of abode of the party with some person of suitable age and discretion then residing therein. Service by electronic means is complete when the electronic equipment being used by the party being served acknowledges receipt of the material. If the equipment used by the party being served does not automatically acknowledge the transmission, service is not complete until the sending party obtains an acknowledgment from the recipient. Service by mail is complete upon mailing.

Whenever service is required or permitted to be made upon a party who is represented by an attorney of record in the proceedings, the service shall be made upon such attorney.

Whenever an agency issues an order or serves a notice or other document, the order or notice or other document shall be dated and shall be deemed to have been issued on the day it is served on the parties to the matter. If the order or notice or other document is to be served by mail, it shall be dated and shall be deemed to have been issued on the day it is mailed.

In computing any period of time prescribed or allowed by this Article 1, by order of an agency, or by any applicable statute or agency rule, the day of the act, event or default from which the designated period of time begins to run shall not be included. The last day of the period so computed shall be included, unless it is a Saturday, a Sunday or a legal holiday, as defined by statute, or any other day when the agency’s office is in fact closed, whether with or without legal authority, in which event the period runs until the end of the next day which is not a Saturday, a Sunday, a legal holiday or any other day when the agency’s office is closed. When the period of time prescribed or allowed is less than seven (7) days, intermediate Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays shall be excluded in the computation. In the event any legal holiday falls on a Sunday, the next following day shall be a legal holiday.

Whenever a party has the right or is required to do some act or take some proceedings within a prescribed period after the service of a notice, order, pleading, motion or other paper upon him and the notice or paper is served upon him by mail, three (3) days shall be added to the prescribed period.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-1.107.
Report of conflicts between chapter and other laws; conforming legislation; compliance.

Every agency as defined in this chapter shall, no later than October 1, 2003, file with the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House a report which outlines any conflicts between this chapter and any other laws affecting the agency. This report shall include proposed legislation to bring the other laws into conformity with the requirements of this chapter. The Secretary of State shall, no later than December 1, 2003, file with the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House a list of sections which the Secretary of State believes conflict with this chapter. The Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House shall maintain a list of agencies which have complied with this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 27 eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 19, 2003.).